Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2936
State Veterinarian, defined.

State Veterinarian means the veterinarian appointed pursuant to section 81-202 or his or her designee, subordinate to the director.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 36.